Maryland, session 2026, HB0917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–1008.
(c) (1) [If a] A carrier MAY retroactively [denies] DENY reimbursement to a
health care provider[, the carrier] ONLY IF:
(i) [may only retroactively deny] THE RETROACTIVE DENIAL OF
reimbursement IS for services subject to coordination of benefits with another carrier, the
Maryland Medical Assistance Program, or the Medicare Program AND IS MADE during the
18–month period after the date that the carrier paid the health care provider; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0917*

HOUSE BILL 917
(ii) except as provided in item (i) of this paragraph, [may only
retroactively deny reimbursement] THE CARRIER HAS PREVIOUSLY PROVIDED THE
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER WITH TRAINING ON REIMBURSEMENT PROTOCOLS,
BILLING STANDARDS, AND COMPLIANCE REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO THE
RETROACTIVE DENIAL OF REIMBURSEMENT AND THE DENIAL IS MADE during the
[6–month] 3–MONTH period after the date that the [carrier paid the] health care provider
PROVIDED THE SERVICES.
(2) (i) A carrier that retroactively denies reimbursement to a health
care provider under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall provide the health care provider
with a written statement specifying the basis for the retroactive denial AND ANY
SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS OR CALCULATIONS.
(ii) If the retroactive denial of reimbursement results from
coordination of benefits by a carrier that is not a managed care organization, the written
statement shall provide the name and address of the entity acknowledging responsibility
for payment of the denied claim.
(3) A CARRIER MAY NOT RETROACTIVELY DENY REIMBURSEMENT
FOR A SERVICE:
(I) BASED ON THE OUTCOME OF THE SERVICE; OR
(II) 1. BEFORE HAVING A CONVERSATION WITH THE HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER IN WHICH THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IS GIVEN THE
OPPORTUNITY TO EXPLAIN THE CIRCUMSTANCES, RATIONALE, OR JUSTIFICATION
FOR THE SERVICE BEING CONSIDERED FOR RETROACTIVE DENIAL OF
REIMBURSEMENT; AND
2. WITHOUT TAKING INTO ACCOUNT THE TOTALITY OF
THE CIRCUMSTANCES AS VIEWED PROSPECTIVELY BASED ON THE CIRCUMSTANCES,
RATIONALE, OR JUSTIFICATION OFFERED BY THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER UNDER
ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM.
(4) EACH CARRIER THAT RETROACTIVELY DENIES REIMBURSEMENT
SHALL DEVELOP A PLAN FOR TRAINING HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS ON
REIMBURSEMENT PROTOCOLS, BILLING STANDARDS, AND COMPLIANCE
REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO THE RETROACTIVE DENIAL OF REIMBURSEMENT.
(5) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER OR INSURED FROM APPEALING A RETROACTIVE DENIAL
OR REIMBURSEMENT AS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS TITLE.

HOUSE BILL 917 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.